California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
(d) The guidelines may include streamlining of project delivery by authorizing local or regional transportation agencies to seek commission approval of a letter of no prejudice that allows the agency to expend its own funds in advance of an allocation of funds by the commission, and to be reimbursed at a later time for eligible expenditures. A letter of no prejudice shall only be available to local or regional transportation agencies for moneys that have been identified for future allocation to the applicant agency. Moneys designated pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 2032 shall only be reimbursed when there is funding available in an amount sufficient to make the reimbursement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 255, Sec. 5.   (AB 135)   Effective September 16, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2033.5.

The department, from funds made available pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 2032, shall allocate local planning grants to encourage local and regional planning that furthers state goals, including, but not limited to, the goals and best practices cited in the regional transportation plan guidelines adopted by the commission pursuant to Sections 14522 to 14522.3, inclusive, of the Government Code. The department shall develop a grant guide and shall consult with the State Air Resources Board, the Governor’s Office of Planning and Research, and the Department of Housing and Community Development in the development of the grant guide, and shall provide status reports as it administers these funds. The grant guide shall be exempt from the
 Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 20, Sec. 17.   (AB 115)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2034.

(a) (1) Before receiving an apportionment of funds under the program pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 2032 from the Controller in a fiscal year, an eligible city or county shall submit to the commission a list of projects proposed to be funded with these funds. Two or more eligible cities, or one or more cities and a county, may propose a project to be jointly funded with these funds.
 Each city or county that proposes to jointly fund a project shall include its participation in the project in its list of projects submitted to the commission. All projects proposed to receive funding shall be adopted by resolution by the applicable city council or county board of supervisors at a regular public meeting. A proposed jointly funded project shall additionally be endorsed by a memorandum of understanding that is approved by the entities proposing
 to jointly fund
 the project and that includes the identity of the project’s lead agency and a description of the individual contributions of each participating city and county to the project. The list of projects proposed to be funded with these funds, including jointly funded projects, shall include a description and the location of each proposed project, a proposed schedule for that project’s completion, and the estimated useful life of the improvement. The project list shall not limit the flexibility of an eligible city or county to fund projects in
 accordance with local needs and priorities so long as the projects are consistent with subdivision (b) of Section 2030.

(2) The commission shall submit an initial report to the Controller that indicates the cities and counties that have submitted a list of projects as described in this subdivision and that are therefore eligible to receive an apportionment of funds under the program for the applicable fiscal year. If the commission receives a list of projects from a city or county after it submits its initial report to the Controller, the commission shall submit a subsequent report to the Controller that indicates the cities and counties that submitted a list of projects after the commission submitted its initial report.

(3) The Controller, upon receipt of the initial
 report, shall apportion funds to eligible cities and counties.

(4) (A) For any city or county that is not included in the initial report submitted to the Controller pursuant to paragraph (2), the Controller shall retain the monthly share of funds that would otherwise be apportioned and distributed to the city or county pursuant to paragraph (3).

(B) If the Controller receives a subsequent report from the commission within 90 days of receiving the initial report from the commission that a city or county has become eligible to receive an apportionment, the Controller shall apportion the funds retained pursuant to subparagraph (A) to the city or county.

(C) The Controller shall reapportion to all eligible
 cities and counties pursuant to the formula in clauses (i) and (ii) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 2103 any funds that were retained pursuant to subparagraph (A) but that were not apportioned and distributed pursuant to subparagraph (B).

(b) For each fiscal year, each city or county receiving an apportionment of funds shall, upon expending program funds, submit documentation to the commission that details the expenditures of all funds under the program, including a description and location of each completed project, the amount of funds expended on the project, the completion date, if applicable, and the estimated useful life of the improvement. For projects jointly
 funded pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), each participating city and county shall submit to the commission the documentation required pursuant to this subdivision.

(c) Before receiving an apportionment of funds under the program pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 2032, an eligible city or county may expend other funds on eligible projects and may reimburse the source of those other funds when it receives its apportionment from the Controller over one or more years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 108, Sec. 1.   (SB 640)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2036.

(a) Cities and counties shall maintain their existing commitment of local funds for street, road, and highway purposes in order to remain eligible for an allocation or apportionment of funds pursuant to Section 2032.

(b) In order to receive an allocation or apportionment pursuant to Section 2032, the city or county shall annually expend from its general fund for street, road, and highway purposes an amount not less than the annual average of its expenditures from its general fund during the 2009–10, 2010–11, and 2011–12 fiscal years, as reported to the Controller pursuant to Section 2151. For purposes of this subdivision, in calculating a city’s or county’s annual general fund expenditures and its average general fund expenditures for the 2009–10, 2010–11, and
 2011–12 fiscal years, any unrestricted funds that the city or county may expend at its discretion, including vehicle in-lieu tax revenues and revenues from fines and forfeitures, expended for street, road, and highway purposes shall be considered expenditures from the general fund. One-time allocations that have been expended for street and highway purposes, but which may not be available on an ongoing basis, including revenue provided under the Teeter Plan Bond Law of 1994 (Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 54773) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), shall not be considered when calculating a city’s or county’s annual general fund expenditures.

(c) For any city incorporated after July 1, 2009, the Controller shall calculate
 an annual average expenditure for the period between July 1, 2009, to December 31, 2015, inclusive, that the city was incorporated.

(d) For purposes of subdivision (b), the Controller may request fiscal data from cities and counties in addition to data provided pursuant to Section 2151, for the 2009–10, 2010–11, and 2011–12 fiscal years. Each city and county shall furnish the data to the Controller not later than 120 days after receiving the request. The Controller may withhold payment to cities and counties that do not comply with the request for information or that provide incomplete data.

(e) The Controller may perform audits to ensure compliance with subdivision (b) when deemed
 necessary.

(1) For any city or county that has not complied with subdivision (b), the Controller shall withhold from its apportionment pursuant to Section 2032 for a fiscal year following an audit an amount up to the amount of funds that the city or county received during the fiscal year that was audited. The amount withheld shall be reapportioned in one annual payment pursuant to paragraph (3).

(2) If the amount to be apportioned pursuant to Section 2032 is less than the amount to be withheld pursuant to paragraph (1), the city or county shall reimburse the state for the difference between the amount withheld and the apportionment that was received during the fiscal year that was audited. If the city or county is ineligible for an apportionment pursuant to Section 2032, the city or county shall reimburse the state in an amount equal to the allocation or apportionment it received
 in the fiscal year that was audited.

(3) Any funds withheld or returned as a result of a failure to comply with subdivision (b) shall be reallocated or reapportioned to the other counties or cities whose expenditures are in compliance during the fiscal year that the funds are withheld or returned. The reallocation or reapportionment shall be pursuant to the formula in clauses (i) and (ii) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 2103.

(4) The Controller may adopt any rules, regulations, and procedures necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

(f) If a city or county fails to comply with the requirements of subdivision (b) in a particular fiscal year, the city or county may expend during that fiscal year and the following fiscal year a total amount that is not less than the total
 amount required to be expended for those fiscal years for purposes of complying with subdivision (b).

(g) For the 2019–20 fiscal year, cities and counties are not required to comply with the annual expenditure requirements set forth in subdivision (b) or (c).

(h) For the 2020–21 fiscal year, the Controller shall adjust the annual expenditure requirements in subdivisions (b) and (c) in proportion to any decrease in taxable sales within the applicable city or county from the 2018–19 fiscal year to the 2019–20 fiscal year. The Controller shall not make an adjustment if taxable sales increased.

(i) For the 2021–22 fiscal year, the Controller shall adjust the annual expenditure requirements in subdivisions (b) and (c) in proportion to any
 decrease in taxable sales within the applicable city or county from the 2018–19 fiscal year to the 2020–21 fiscal year. The Controller shall not make an adjustment if taxable sales increased.

(j) A city or county may petition the Controller to use transient occupancy tax revenues, in lieu of taxable sales, for purposes of adjusting the calculation in subdivision (i), if transient occupancy tax revenues in the 2018–19 fiscal year exceeded the amount determined in subdivision (b) and the amount of decrease in transient occupancy tax revenues from the 2018–19 fiscal year to the 2020–21 fiscal year exceeds the amount of decrease in sales and use tax revenues from the 2018–19 fiscal year to the 2020–21 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 81, Sec. 20.   (AB 149)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

2037.

A city or county may spend its apportionment of funds under the program on transportation priorities other than those allowable pursuant to this chapter if the city’s or county’s average Pavement Condition Index meets or exceeds 80.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 5, Sec. 36.   (SB 1)   Effective April 28, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2038.

(a) The California Workforce Development Board shall develop guidelines for public agencies receiving Road Maintenance and Rehabilitation Account funds to participate in, invest in, or partner with, new or existing preapprenticeship training programs established pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 14230 of the Unemployment Insurance Code. The department and local agencies that receive Road Maintenance and Rehabilitation Account funds pursuant to this chapter shall, not later than July 1, 2023, follow the guidelines set forth by the board. The board shall also establish a preapprenticeship development and training grant program, beginning January 1, 2019, pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 14230 of the Unemployment Insurance Code. Local public agencies that receive Road Maintenance and Rehabilitation Account funds
 pursuant to this chapter are eligible to compete for such grants and may apply in partnership with other agencies and entities, including those with existing preapprenticeship programs. Successful grant applicants shall, to the extent feasible:

(1) Follow the multicraft core curriculum implemented by the State Department of Education for its pilot project with the California Partnership Academies and by the California Workforce Development Board and local boards.

(2) Include a plan for outreach to and retention of women participants in the preapprenticeship program to help increase the representation of women in the building and construction trades.

(3) Include a plan for outreach to and retention of minority participants and underrepresented subgroups in the preapprenticeship program to help increase their
 representation in the building and construction trades.

(4) Include a plan for outreach to and retention of disadvantaged youth participants in the preapprenticeship program to help increase their employment opportunities in the building and construction trades.

(5) Include a plan for outreach to individuals in the local labor market area and to formerly incarcerated individuals to provide pathways to employment and training.

(6) Coordinate with local state-approved apprenticeship programs, local building trade councils, and to the extent possible the California Conservation Corps and certified community conservation corps, so individuals who have completed these programs have a pathway to continued employment.

(b) As a condition of receiving a grant,
 grantees shall collect demographic data from participants and shall report this data to the California Workforce Development Board. The California Workforce Development Board shall provide technical assistance to grantees on the manner in which to collect this data. The California Workforce Development Board shall report this demographic data to the Legislature, detailing the racial, ethnic, and gender makeup of participants in the grant program, including demographic data on participation, completion, and placement on
 the timeline prescribed in subdivision (t) of Section 14013 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 83, Sec. 21.   (SB 171)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Highway Users Tax Account [2100. - 2127.]

2100.

The Highway Users Tax Fund is continued in existence as the Highway Users Tax Account in the Transportation Tax Fund.

Any reference in any law or regulation to the Highway Users Tax Fund shall be deemed to refer to the Highway Users Tax Account in the Transportation Tax Fund.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Controller may use the
 funds in the Highway Users Tax Account in the Transportation Tax Fund for cashflow loans to the General Fund as provided in Sections 16310 and 16381 of the Government Code. Any such loan shall be exempt from paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 16310 of the Government Code. Interest shall be paid on all moneys loaned to the General Fund and shall be computed at a rate determined by the Pooled Money Investment Board to be the current earning rate of the fund from which the money is loaned. This subdivision does not authorize any transfer that would interfere with the carrying out of the object for which these funds were created.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 1, Sec. 9.   (SB 95)   Effective February 3, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2101.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys in the Highway Users Tax Account in the Transportation Tax Fund and hereafter received in the account are appropriated for all of the following:

(a) The research, planning, construction, improvement, maintenance, and operation of public streets and highways, including their related public facilities for nonmotorized traffic, the mitigation of their environmental effects, the payment for property taken or damaged for those purposes, and the administrative costs necessarily incurred in the foregoing purposes. For purposes of this subdivision, “maintenance of public streets and highways” shall include maintenance or removal of cattle
 guards within the right-of-way of a county highway.

(b) The research and planning for exclusive public mass transit
 guideways, their related fixed facilities, the payment for property taken or damaged for those purposes, and the administrative costs necessarily incurred in the foregoing purposes.

(c) The construction and improvement of exclusive public mass transit guideways, including their related fixed facilities, the mitigation of their environmental effects, the payment for property taken or damaged for those purposes, the administrative costs necessarily incurred in the foregoing purposes, and the maintenance of the structures and the immediate right-of-way for the public mass transit guideways, but excluding the maintenance and operating costs for mass transit power systems and mass transit passenger facilities, vehicles, equipment, and services, in any area where the voters have approved a proposition pursuant to Section 4 of
 Article XIX of the California Constitution.

(d) The payment of principal and interest on voter-approved bonds issued for the purposes specified in subdivision (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 636, Sec. 5.   (AB 1810)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2102.

Net revenue derived from a tax means the amount of revenue derived from a tax that is deposited into the Highway Users Tax Account in the Transportation Tax Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1153.)
-------------------------------------------

2103.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, of the net revenues deposited to the credit of the Highway Users Tax Account that are derived from the increases in the rates of taxes that are imposed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 7360 and Section 7361.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, all of the following shall occur on a monthly basis:

(1) (A) By the 15th day of every month, the Treasurer’s office, in consultation with the Department of Finance, shall notify the Controller of the amount of debt service that will be paid on each transportation bond during that month.

(B) Within two business days following the 28th day of each month, the Controller shall
 transfer to the Transportation Debt Service Fund an amount equal to the amount of monthly debt service paid by the General Fund on any bonds issued pursuant to the Seismic Retrofit Bond Act of 1996 (Chapter 12.48 (commencing with Section 8879) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code) or any other bonds issued for highway or eligible guideway projects consistent with the requirements applicable to the expenditure of revenues under Article XIX of the California Constitution as identified by the Department of Finance pursuant to Section 16965 of the Government Code, and three-quarters of the amount of monthly debt service paid on any bonds issued pursuant to the Highway Safety, Traffic Reduction, Air Quality, and Port Security Bond Act of 2006 (Chapter 12.49 (commencing with Section 8879.20) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government
 Code) for reimbursement of the General Fund for these costs. If revenues available pursuant to this subdivision in any given month are insufficient to fully reimburse the General Fund for the debt service payments made, the first revenues available pursuant to this subdivision in the following month or months shall be transferred to the Transportation Debt Service Fund so that all debt service payments made on these bonds from the General Fund in a given fiscal year are fully reimbursed. No further transfers shall be made pursuant to this subparagraph once the transfers for the months of July to October, inclusive, in 2010 have been made. Any transfers made from the net revenues identified in this paragraph for highway and eligible guideway bond debt service for months after October
 2010 shall be reversed and shall instead be made from weight fee revenues in the State Highway Account, as described in subparagraph (F).

(C) Beginning November 2, 2010, the Controller shall transfer to the State Highway Account within two business days following the 28th day of each month all of the monthly net revenues identified in subparagraph (B) that were designated for highway and eligible guideway bond debt service reimbursement but that have not been transferred, or that were transferred by means of a transfer that was reversed, pursuant to that subparagraph. To the extent the Controller has distributed any of those net revenues to cities and counties pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3) between November 2, 2010, and March 24, 2011, the Controller shall subsequently reduce the amount transferred to cities and counties on a monthly basis pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3) and shall instead transfer these funds to the
 State Highway Account until all of the revenues that would otherwise have been transferred to the State Highway Account on and after November 2, 2010, pursuant to this subparagraph have been so transferred. For the 2011–12 fiscal year, the Controller shall transfer to the State Highway Account within two business days following the 28th day of each month an amount equal to the weight fee revenues transferred to the Transportation Debt Service Fund pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 9400.4 of the Vehicle Code, including forty-three million seven hundred thousand dollars ($43,700,000) authorized pursuant to Item 2660-013-0042 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2011 and an amount equal to weight fee revenues transferred to the General Fund as a loan pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 9400.4 of the Vehicle Code. To the extent the Controller has distributed any of those revenues to cities and counties pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3), the Controller shall subsequently reduce the amount
 transferred to cities and counties on a monthly basis pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3) and instead transfer these funds to the State Highway Account until all of the revenues that would otherwise have been transferred to the State Highway Account in the 2011–12 fiscal year pursuant to this subparagraph have been so transferred.

(D) Notwithstanding subparagraph (C), commencing with the 2012–13 fiscal year and every fiscal year thereafter, the Controller shall transfer to the State Highway Account within two business days following the 28th day of each month an amount equal to the amount of weight fee revenues transferred to the Transportation Debt Service Fund for highway and eligible guideway bond debt service and to the General Fund as a loan pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 9400.4 of the Vehicle Code.

(E) Beginning July 1, 2011, transfers made under
 subparagraphs (C) and (D) during a fiscal year shall not exceed the annual revenue generated from weight fees, as determined by Sections 9400.4 and 42205 of the Vehicle Code, at the rates in effect as of March 24, 2011, as determined by the Department of Finance.

(F) Any remaining amount of the highway or eligible guideway bond debt service reimbursement authorized by this paragraph that has not been made pursuant to subparagraph (B) on and after November 2, 2010, shall instead be made pursuant to subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) of Section 9400.4 of the Vehicle Code from revenues in the State Highway Account derived from weight fees deposited in the account pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 9400.1 and Section 42205 of the Vehicle Code.

(2) (A) In the 2010–11 fiscal year, after the monthly transfer made pursuant to paragraph (1), the sum of fifty-four
 million one hundred sixty-seven thousand dollars ($54,167,000) per month shall be held in the account for future appropriation by the Legislature.

(B) Notwithstanding any other law, with respect to the monthly net revenues described in subparagraph (A), no further transfers of these revenues for the purpose of loans to the General Fund shall be made pursuant to Item 2660-011-0062 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2010 once the loan transfers for the months of July to October, inclusive, in 2010 have been made. Notwithstanding the loan repayment date specified in the provisional language for that item, the funds loaned shall be repaid by June 30, 2021. Any transfers made from the monthly net revenues in subparagraph (A) for months after October 2010 shall be reversed and shall instead be made from weight fee revenues in the State Highway Account,
 as described in subparagraph (D). The revenues from loan repayments shall be held in the Highway Users Tax Account for future appropriation by the Legislature.

(C) Beginning November 2, 2010, all of the monthly net revenues described in subparagraph (A) shall instead be transferred by the Controller to the State Highway Account within two business days following the 28th day of each month. To the extent that the Controller has distributed any of the revenues identified in this paragraph to cities and counties pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3) between October 14, 2010, and March 24, 2011, the Controller shall subsequently reduce the amount transferred to cities and counties on a monthly basis pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3) and shall instead transfer these funds to the State Highway Account until all of the revenues that would have been transferred to the General Fund as a loan pursuant to Item 2660-011-0062 of Section
 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2010 on and after November 2, 2010, have instead been transferred to the State Highway Account.

(D) Any remaining amount of the loans to the General Fund authorized pursuant to Item 2660-011-0062 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2010 that has not been made pursuant to subparagraph (B) on and after November 2, 2010, shall instead be made pursuant to Section 9400.4 of the Vehicle Code from revenues in the State Highway Account derived from weight fees deposited in the account pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 9400.1 and Section 42205 of the Vehicle Code.

(3) The Controller shall transfer any remaining net revenues subject to this subdivision as follows:

(A) Forty-four
 percent shall be transferred to the State Highway Account to fund projects in the State Transportation Improvement Program that are consistent with Section
 2 of Article XIX of the California Constitution.

(B) Twelve percent shall be transferred to the State Highway Account to fund projects in the State Highway Operation and Protection Program.

(C) Forty-four percent shall be apportioned by
 the Controller for local street and road purposes, except in the 2010–11 fiscal year, 50 percent shall be transferred for purposes of this subparagraph as follows:

(i) Fifty percent shall be apportioned by the Controller to cities, including a city and county, in the proportion that the total population of the city bears to the total population of all the cities in the state.

(ii) Fifty percent shall be apportioned by the Controller to counties, including a city and county, in accordance with the following formulas:

(I) Seventy-five percent shall be apportioned among the counties in the proportion that the number of fee-paid and exempt vehicles that are registered in the county bear to the number of fee-paid and exempt vehicles registered in the state.

(II) Twenty-five percent shall be apportioned among the counties in the proportion that the number of miles of maintained county roads in each county bear to the total number of miles of maintained county roads in the state. For purposes of apportioning funds under this subclause, any roads within the boundaries of a city and county that are not state highways shall be deemed to be county roads.

(b) After the transfers or other actions pursuant to subdivision (a), at least 90 percent of the balance deposited to the credit of the Highway Users Tax Account in the Transportation Tax Fund by the 28th day of each month shall be apportioned or
 transferred, as applicable, by the Controller by the seventh working day thereafter. These apportionments or transfers shall be made as provided for in Sections 2104 to 2122, inclusive. If information is not available to make the apportionment or transfer as required, the apportionment or transfer shall be made on the basis of the information of the previous month. Amounts not apportioned or transferred shall be included in the apportionment or transfer of the subsequent month.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the funds apportioned by the Controller to cities and counties pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) are not subject to Section 7104 or 7104.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. These funds may be expended for any street and road purpose consistent with the requirements of this
 chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 205, Sec. 3.   (AB 1157)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2103.1.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 2103, the portion of revenues in the Highway Users Tax Account attributable to the increases in the motor vehicle fuel excise tax pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 7360 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, as adjusted pursuant to subdivision (d) of that section, shall be transferred to the Road Maintenance and Rehabilitation Account pursuant to Section 2031.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 2103, the portion of revenues in the Highway Users Tax Account attributable to the increase in the diesel fuel excise tax pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 60050 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, as adjusted pursuant to subdivision (c) of that section, shall be transferred as follows:

(1) Fifty percent to the Trade Corridors Enhancement Account pursuant to Section 2192.4.

(2) Fifty percent to the Road Maintenance and Rehabilitation Account pursuant to Section 2031.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 2103, the portion of the revenues in the Highway Users Tax Account attributable to the storage taxes imposed pursuant to Sections 7361.2 and 60050.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code shall be deposited in the Road Maintenance and Rehabilitation Account created pursuant to Section 2031.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 5, Sec. 37.   (SB 1)   Effective April 28, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2104.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, a sum equal to the net revenue derived from 11.3 percent of the per gallon tax under the Motor Vehicle Fuel License Tax Law (Part 2 (commencing with Section 7301) of Division 2), 1.80 cents ($0.0180) under the Use Fuel Tax Law (Part 3 (commencing with Section 8601) of Division 2), and 11.5 percent of the per gallon tax under the Diesel Fuel Tax Law (Part 31 (commencing with Section 60001) of Division 2) of the Revenue and Taxation Code, shall be apportioned among the counties, as follows:

(a) Each county shall be paid one thousand six hundred sixty-seven dollars ($1,667) during each calendar month, which amount shall be expended exclusively for engineering costs and administrative expenses with respect to county roads.

(b) A sum equal to the total of all reimbursable snow removal or snow grooming, or both, costs filed pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 2152, or seven million dollars ($7,000,000), whichever is less, shall be apportioned in 12 approximately equal monthly apportionments for snow removal or snow grooming, or both, on county roads, as provided in Section 2110.

(c) A sum equal to five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) shall be apportioned in 12 approximately equal monthly apportionments, as provided in Section 2110.5.

(d) (1) Seventy-five percent of the funds payable under this section shall be apportioned among the counties monthly in the respective proportions that the number of fee-paid and exempt vehicles which are registered in each county bears to the total number of fee-paid and exempt
 vehicles registered in the state.

(2) For purposes of apportionment under this subdivision, the Department of Motor Vehicles shall, as soon as possible after the last day of each calendar month, furnish to the Controller a verified statement showing the number of fee-paid and exempt vehicles which are registered in each county and in the state as of the last day of each calendar month as reflected by the records of the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(e) Of the remaining money payable, there shall be paid to each eligible county an amount that is computed monthly as follows: The number of miles of maintained county roads in each county shall be multiplied by sixty dollars ($60); from the resultant amount, there shall be deducted the amount received by each county under subdivision (d) and the remainder, if any, shall be paid to each county.

(f) The remaining money payable, after the foregoing apportionments, shall be apportioned among the counties in the same proportion as the money referred to in subdivision (d).

(g) (1) Transfers of revenues from the Highway Users Tax Account to counties pursuant to this section collected during the months of March, April, May, June, and July of 2008, shall be made with the transfer of August 2008 revenues in September of 2008. This suspension shall not apply to a county with a population of less than 40,000.

(2) For the purpose of meeting the cash obligations associated with ongoing budgeted costs, a county may make use of any cash balance in its county road fund, including that resulting from the receipt of funds pursuant to the Highway Safety, Traffic Reduction, Air Quality, and Port Security Bond
 Act of 2006 (Chapter 12.49 (commencing with Section 8879.20) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code (hereafter bond act)) for local streets and roads maintenance, during the period of this suspension, without the use of this cash being reflected as an expenditure of bond act funds, provided the cash is replaced once this suspension is repaid in September of 2008. Counties may accrue the revenue received in September 2008 as repayment of these suspensions for the months of April, May, and June of 2008 back to the 2007–08 fiscal year. Nothing in this paragraph shall change the fact that expenditures must be accrued and reflected from the appropriate funding sources for which the moneys were received and meet all the requirements of those funding sources.

(h) (1) The transfer of revenues from the Highway Users Tax Account to counties pursuant to this section that are collected during the months of January, February,
 and March 2009, shall be made with the transfer of April 2009 revenues in May 2009.

(2) For the purpose of meeting the cash obligations associated with ongoing budgeted costs, a county may make use of any cash balance in its county road fund, including that resulting from the receipt of funds pursuant to the Highway Safety, Traffic Reduction, Air Quality, and Port Security Bond Act of 2006 (Chapter 12.49 (commencing with Section 8879.20) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code (bond act)) for local streets and roads maintenance during the period of this suspension, provided the cash is replaced once this suspension is repaid in May of 2009.

(3) This subdivision shall not affect any requirement that an expenditure is required to be accrued and reflected from the appropriate funding source for which the money was received and to meet all the requirements of its funding
 source.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 5, Sec. 38.   (SB 1)   Effective April 28, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2104.1.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the Controller shall deduct annually, from the amount apportioned pursuant to Section 2104, the amount identified as applicable to counties in the report submitted in the preceding fiscal year pursuant to Section 191, and shall transfer the amount to the State Highway Account. The transferred amount shall be subject to appropriation pursuant to Section 183 for expenditure in
 accordance with Section 163.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 1, Sec. 13.   (SB 95)   Effective February 3, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2105.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, in addition to the apportionments prescribed by Sections 2104, 2106, and 2107, from the revenues derived from a per gallon tax imposed pursuant to Section 7360 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and a per gallon tax imposed pursuant to Sections 8651, 8651.5, and 8651.6 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and a per gallon tax imposed pursuant to Sections 60050 and 60115 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, the following apportionments shall be made:

(a) A sum equal to 5.8 percent of the per gallon tax under Section 7360 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, 11.5 percent of any per gallon tax in excess of nine cents ($0.09) per gallon under Sections 8651, 8651.5, and 8651.6 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and 6.5 percent of the per gallon tax
 under Sections 60050 and 60115 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, shall be apportioned among the counties, including a city and county.

The amount of apportionment to each county, including a city and county, during a fiscal year shall be calculated as follows:

(1) One million dollars ($1,000,000) for apportionment to all counties, including a city and county, in proportion to each county’s receipts during the prior fiscal year under Sections 2104 and 2106.

(2) One million dollars ($1,000,000) for apportionment to all counties, including a city and county, as follows:

(A) Seventy-five percent in the proportion that the number of fee-paid and exempt vehicles which are registered in the county bears to the number of fee-paid and exempt vehicles registered in the state.

(B) Twenty-five percent in the proportion that the number of miles of maintained county roads in the county bears to the miles of maintained county roads in the state.

(3) For each county, determine its factor which is the higher amount calculated pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) divided by the sum of the higher amounts for all of the counties.

(4) The amount to be apportioned to each county is equal to its factor multiplied by the amount available for apportionment.

(b) A sum equal to 5.8 percent of the per gallon tax under Section 7360 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, 11.5 percent of any per gallon tax in excess of nine cents ($0.09) per gallon under Sections 8651, 8651.5, and 8651.6 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and 6.5 percent of the per gallon
 tax under Sections 60050 and 60115 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, shall be apportioned to cities, including a city and county, in the proportion that the total population of the city bears to the total population of all the cities in the state.
